Utah statutes.
54-8-30.   Commencement of conversion -- When required.
If an improvement district is established pursuant to this chapter, the public
utility corporations involved shall not be required to commence conversion
until the ordinance, the assessment roll and issuance of bonds have become
final and no civil action has been filed or if civil action has been filed,
until the decision of the court upon the action has become final and is not
subject to further appeal.
